New Jersey, session 221, A5723.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  For the purposes of this section, electric or gas public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes electric or gas service to end users. b.    Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, beginning on June 1, 2025 and through September 30, 2025, the sale or use of electric or gas utility service shall be exempt from the tax imposed pursuant to the Sales and Use Tax Act, P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), and no seller of electric or gas utility service may include any tax imposed pursuant to the Sales and Use Tax Act within the purchase price of electric or gas utility service during that period. c.    Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, beginning on June 1, 2025 and through September 30, 2025, an electric or gas public utility shall not be permitted to charge customers any amount for the societal benefits charge otherwise authorized pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire on October 1, 2025.